District of Columbia statutes.
8-1403.02

Consent to inspection.

(a)

The operation of a vehicle subject to this chapter and its implementing regulations on any highway or roadway in the District shall constitute the consent of the driver and the owner of the vehicle to the inspection pursuant to § 8-1403.01.

(b)

The driver of a vehicle shall obey every sign and every direction of a police officer to stop the vehicle and submit to an inspection.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 4(b)
as added Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-173, § 3(b), 39 DCR 5834

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3303.2.